Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,135
Insurer; immunity from liability.

Any insurer or employee of an insurer making a report as required by section 38-1,129 or 38-1,130 shall be immune from criminal penalty of any kind or from civil liability or other penalty for slander, libel, defamation, breach of the privilege between consumer and physician or between consumer and professional counselor, or violation of the laws of the State of Nebraska relating to the business of insurance that may be incurred or imposed on account of or in connection with the making of such report.

Laws 1982, LB 421, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 130, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,204;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 135.